Verbs.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +Inf +Neg +Pos +Imp +Cn +Subjcv +Sim +PPerf +PPart +Pass +F +ObjC +1p +2p +3p +Sg +Pl

LEXICON Root
+Neg+Cn:nemi~ 		V1;
+Pos+Cn:mi~ 		V1;
+Neg+Subjcv:n~ 		V1;
+Pos+Subjcv:b~		V1;
+Neg+Imp:n~			V2;
+Pos+Imp:b~			V2;
+Pos+F: 			V9inf;
+Neg+F:n~ 			V9inf;

+Neg+Cn:nemi~ 		V3;
+Pos+Cn:mi~ 		V3;
+Neg+Sim:n~ 		V3;
+Pos+Sim: 			V3;
+Neg+PPart:n~ 		V4;
+Pos+PPart: 		V4;
+Neg+PPerf:n~ 		V5;
+Pos+PPerf: 		V5;
+Pos+Pass: 			V6;
+Neg+Pass:n~		V6;
+Neg+Subjcv:n~ 		V7;
+Pos+Subjcv: 		V7;

+Inf: 				V8;



LEXICON V1inf
+1p+Sg:~am	#;
+2p+Sg:~i	#;
+3p+Sg:~ad	#;
+1p+Pl:~im	#;
+2p+Pl:~id	#;
+3p+Pl:~and	#;
+1p+Sg+ObjC:~am 	ObjClitics;
+2p+Sg+ObjC:~i 		ObjClitics;
+3p+Sg+ObjC:~ad		ObjClitics;
+1p+Pl+ObjC:~im		ObjClitics;
+2p+Pl+ObjC:~id		ObjClitics;
+3p+Pl+ObjC:~and	ObjClitics;

LEXICON V2inf
+Sg:0  #;
+Pl:id #;
+Sg+ObjC:0 	ObjClitics;
+Pl+ObjC:~id ObjClitics;

LEXICON V3inf
+1p+Sg:~am		#;
+2p+Sg:~i		#;
+3p+Sg:0		#;
+1p+Pl:~im		#;
+2p+Pl:~id		#;
+3p+Pl:~and		#;
+1p+Sg+ObjC:~am		ObjClitics;
+2p+Sg+ObjC:~i		ObjClitics;
+3p+Sg+ObjC:0		ObjClitics;
+1p+Pl+ObjC:~im		ObjClitics;
+2p+Pl+ObjC:~id		ObjClitics;
+3p+Pl+ObjC:~and	ObjClitics;

LEXICON V4inf
+1p+Sg:~eam			#;
+2p+Sg:~ei			#;
+3p+Sg:~east		#;
+1p+Pl:~eim			#;
+2p+Pl:~eid			#;
+3p+Pl:~eand		#;
+1p+Sg+ObjC:~eam		ObjClitics;
+2p+Sg+ObjC:~ei			ObjClitics;
+3p+Sg+ObjC:~east		ObjClitics;
+1p+Pl+ObjC:~eim		ObjClitics;
+2p+Pl+ObjC:~eid		ObjClitics;
+3p+Pl+ObjC:~eand		ObjClitics;

LEXICON V5inf
+1p+Sg:~ebudam		#;
+2p+Sg:~ebudi		#;
+3p+Sg:~ebud 		#;
+1p+Pl:~ebudim		#;
+2p+Pl:~ebudid		#;
+3p+Pl:~ebudand		#;
+1p+Sg+ObjC:~ebudam		ObjClitics;
+2p+Sg+ObjC:~ebudi		ObjClitics;
+3p+Sg+ObjC:~ebud 		ObjClitics;
+1p+Pl+ObjC:~ebudim		ObjClitics;
+2p+Pl+ObjC:~ebudid		ObjClitics;
+3p+Pl+ObjC:~ebudand	ObjClitics;

LEXICON V6inf
+1p+Sg:~eshodeam				#;
+2p+Sg:~eshodei					#;
+3p+Sg:~eshodeast				#;
+1p+Pl:~eshodeim				#;
+2p+Pl:~eshodeid				#;
+3p+Pl:~eshodeand				#;
+1p+Sg+ObjC:~eshodeam		ObjClitics;
+2p+Sg+ObjC:~eshodei		ObjClitics;
+3p+Sg+ObjC:~eshodeast		ObjClitics;
+1p+Pl+ObjC:~eshodeim		ObjClitics;
+2p+Pl+ObjC:~eshodeid		ObjClitics;
+3p+Pl+ObjC:~eshodeand		ObjClitics;

LEXICON V7inf
+1p+Sg:~ebaasham			#;
+2p+Sg:~ebaashi				#;
+3p+Sg:~ebaashad 			#;
+1p+Pl:~ebaashim			#;
+2p+Pl:~ebaashid			#;
+3p+Pl:~ebaashand			#;
+1p+Sg+ObjC:~ebaasham		ObjClitics;
+2p+Sg+ObjC:~ebaashi		ObjClitics;
+3p+Sg+ObjC:~ebaashad 		ObjClitics;
+1p+Pl+ObjC:~ebaashim		ObjClitics;
+2p+Pl+ObjC:~ebaashid		ObjClitics;
+3p+Pl+ObjC:~ebaashand		ObjClitics;

LEXICON V8inf
0:an #;

LEXICON V9inf
+1p+Sg:xaaham^		V9;
+2p+Sg:xaahi^		V9;
+3p+Sg:xaahad^		V9;
+1p+Pl:xaahim^		V9;
+2p+Pl:xaahid^		V9;
+3p+Pl:xaahand^		V9;

LEXICON ObjClitics
+1p+Sg:~am			#;
+2p+Sg:~at			#;
+3p+Sg:~ash			#;
+1p+Pl:~emaan		#;
+2p+Pl:~etaan		#;
+3p+Pl:~eshaan		#;

LEXICON V1

afkan	V1inf;
bin 	V1inf;
bor 	V1inf;
bu 		V1inf;
fahmaan V1inf;
jonb 	V1inf;
kesh 	V1inf;
shemor 	V1inf;
shenaas V1inf;
xiz 	V1inf;
xor 	V1inf;
zaa 	V1inf;



LEXICON V2

afkan	V2inf;
bin 	V2inf;
bor 	V2inf;
bu 		V2inf;
fahmaan V2inf;
jonb 	V2inf;
kesh 	V2inf;
shemor 	V2inf;
shenaas V2inf;
xiz 	V2inf;
xor 	V2inf;
zaa 	V2inf;



LEXICON V3

afkand 		V3inf;
baaxt 		V3inf;
bord 		V3inf;
borid 		V3inf;
damid 		V3inf;
daanest 	V3inf;
david 		V3inf;
gozasht 	V3inf;
goft 		V3inf;
kosht 		V3inf;
mord 		V3inf;
resid 		V3inf;
xaabid 		V3inf;


LEXICON V4

afkand 		V4inf;
baaxt 		V4inf;
bord 		V4inf;
borid 		V4inf;
damid 		V4inf;
daanest 	V4inf;
david 		V4inf;
gozasht 	V4inf;
goft 		V4inf;
kosht 		V4inf;
mord 		V4inf;
resid 		V4inf;
xaabid 		V4inf;

LEXICON V5

afkand 		V5inf;
baaxt 		V5inf;
bord 		V5inf;
borid 		V5inf;
damid 		V5inf;
daanest 	V5inf;
david 		V5inf;
gozasht 	V5inf;
goft 		V5inf;
kosht 		V5inf;
mord 		V5inf;
resid 		V5inf;
xaabid 		V5inf;

LEXICON V6

afkand 		V6inf;
baaxt 		V6inf;
bord 		V6inf;
borid 		V6inf;
damid 		V6inf;
daanest 	V6inf;
david 		V6inf;
gozasht 	V6inf;
goft 		V6inf;
kosht 		V6inf;
mord 		V6inf;
resid 		V6inf;
xaabid 		V6inf;

LEXICON V7

afkand 		V7inf;
baaxt 		V7inf;
bord 		V7inf;
borid 		V7inf;
damid 		V7inf;
daanest 	V7inf;
david 		V7inf;
gozasht 	V7inf;
goft 		V7inf;
kosht 		V7inf;
mord 		V7inf;
resid 		V7inf;
xaabid 		V7inf;

LEXICON V8

afkand 		V8inf;
baaxt 		V8inf;
bord 		V8inf;
borid 		V8inf;
damid 		V8inf;
daanest 	V8inf;
david 		V8inf;
gozasht 	V8inf;
goft 		V8inf;
kosht 		V8inf;
mord 		V8inf;
resid 		V8inf;
xaabid 		V8inf;


LEXICON V9

afkand 		#;
baaxt 		#;
bord 		#;
borid 		#;
damid 		#;
daanest 	#;
david 		#;
gozasht 	#;
goft 		#;
kosht 		#;
mord 		#;
resid 		#;
xaabid 		#;
